Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1023.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2126(a)(1) of Title 34 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 2126. Unlawful activities.(a) Violations.--It is unlawful for any person while acting under the provisions of this subchapter to:(1) Place any salt, bait or food of any kind or quantity or use any artificial means for the purpose of attracting or luring any game or wildlife upon any lands unless otherwise approved by the commission.* * *Section 2. Section 2308(a)(8) of Title 34 is amended and subsection (b)(2) is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:1234567891011121314151617181920 § 2308. Unlawful devices and methods.(a) General rule.--Except as otherwise provided in this title, it is unlawful for any person to hunt or aid, abet, assist or conspire to hunt any game or wildlife through the use of:* * *(8) Any artificial or natural bait, hay, grain, fruit, nut, salt, chemical, mineral or other food as an enticement for game or wildlife, regardless of kind and quantity, in a manner not authorized by commission regulations, or take advantage of any such area or food or bait prior to 30 days after the removal of such material and its residue in a manner not authorized by commission regulations. Nothing contained in this subsection shall pertain to normal or accepted farming, habitat management practices, oil and gas drilling, mining, forest management activities or other legitimate commercial or industrial practices. Upon discovery of such baited areas, whether prosecution is contemplated or not, the commission may cause a reasonable area surrounding the enticement to be posted against hunting or taking game or wildlife. The posters shall remain for 30 days after complete removal of the bait.* * *(b) Exceptions.--The provisions of subsection (a) shall not apply to:* * *(2) * * *(iv) Any licensed hunter, in an area designated by the commission, using bait to attract deer for removal as provided by commission regulations, including addressing 20250SB1023PN1188 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 wildlife disease transmission, habitat degradation or another purpose or under a special use permit.* * *Section 3. Section 2923 of Title 34 is amended by adding a subsection to read:§ 2923. Disabled person permits.* * *(c.1) Use of bait on private land.--Notwithstanding any other provision of law or regulation, the commission may issue a permit to a person who qualifies for and holds a disabled person permit under subsection (a) to hunt deer through the use of artificial or natural bait on private land. A permit issued under this subsection shall be valid only on private land. A person who does not hold a disabled person permit under subsection (a) may not hunt within 200 yards of a location where bait is present under this subsection. The prohibition under this subsection shall remain in effect while bait is present and for 30 consecutive days after complete removal of the bait. A permittee who is hunting through the use of bait under this subsection shall possess all of the following:(1) A valid permit issued under this subsection.(2) The express written permission of the landowner allowing the use of bait for hunting on the property.* * *Section 4. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1023PN1188 - 3 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425